test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hagi
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: haga
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: haga
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: haga
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: hagar
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: hagar
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: høgum
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: haga
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hagin
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hagan
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: haganum
    hagi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: hagans
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: hagarnir
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: hagarnar
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: høgunum
    hagi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: haganna
